lexc/verb/enhuigeik.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igeaa§ §igetattet§ §szorelol§ 
§j§ §igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeija2§ 
§igejakik2§ §igejatokitek2§
§tatt§ §sj§ §igeoe§ §igeoue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ §igeuomely§
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§
§felteomely§ §szorelolmely§ §tatt2§ §l§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§

       
LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb1
arrébbkúszik:arrébbkúsz AddVerb;
arrébbmászik:arrébbmász AddVerb;
beljebblopódzik:beljebblopódz AddVerbrajz;
elégördeszkázik:elégördeszkáz AddVerb;
feljebbcsúszik:feljebbcsúsz AddVerb;
feljebbkúszik:feljebbkúsz AddVerb;
feljebbtornász AddVerb;
feljebbtornászik:feljebbtornász AddVerb;
fölényúlik:fölényúl AddVerb;
helybenúszik:helybenúsz AddVerb;
közéfolyik:közéfoly AddVerbsz;
lejjebbcsúszik:lejjebbcsúsz AddVerb;
mögélopózik:mögélopóz AddVerb;
odébbcikázik:odébbcikáz AddVerb;
odébbcsúszik:odébbcsúsz AddVerb;
odébbfolyik:odébbfoly AddVerbsz;
odébbmászik:odébbmász AddVerb;
odébbúszik:odébbúsz AddVerb;
ottfeledkezik:ottfeledkez AddVerb;
ottfelejtkezik:ottfelejtkez AddVerb;
ottidőzik:ottidőz AddVerboeue;
ottvész:ottvesz AddVerb;
telihamuzik:telihamuz AddVerb;
telinyálzik:telinyálz AddVerbrajz;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

!LEXICON AddVerbnoik
![stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casenoik;

!LEXICON Casenoik
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^0          #;    !

!If there is only one level endings come from case1
!If there is more than on level, endings come from case
!
LEXICON AddVerbasz
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Caseasz;

LEXICON Caseasz
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol


LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;

LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Pot;
                     Pot2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Pot;
                     Pot2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Pot;
                     Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
                     Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
                     Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
                     Case1;
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                  Case;

LEXICON Verb
agarászik:agarász AddVerb;
alapvizsgázik:alapvizsgáz AddVerb;
allegorizálódik:allegorizálód AddVerb;
amerikázik:amerikáz AddVerb;
araszolódik:araszolód AddVerb;
autókázik:autókáz AddVerb;
bagózik:bagóz AddVerb;
bankettozik:bankettoz AddVerb;
barlangászik:barlangász AddVerb;
bendzsózik:bendzsóz AddVerb;
biflázik:bifláz AddVerb;
birkózik:birkóz AddVerb;
bogarászik:bogarász AddVerb;
bomladozik:bomladoz AddVerb;
borozik:boroz AddVerb;
botorkázik:botorkáz AddVerb;
brillírozik:brillíroz AddVerb;
bujdosik:bujdos AddVerb;
bundázik:bundáz AddVerb;
burnótozik:burnótoz AddVerb;
bánik:bán AddVerb;
bóklászik:bóklász AddVerb;
búcsúzik:búcsúz AddVerb;
cangázik:cangáz AddVerb;
cicózik:cicóz AddVerb;
cigányozik:cigányoz AddVerb;
cirkuszozik:cirkuszoz AddVerb;
csalinkázik:csalinkáz AddVerb;
csatázik:csatáz AddVerb;
csempészik:csempész AddVerb;
cserkészik:cserkész AddVerb;
csigázik:csigáz AddVerb;
csinnadrattázik:csinnadrattáz AddVerb;
csárdásozik:csárdásoz AddVerb;
csónakázik:csónakáz AddVerb;
cukrozik:cukroz AddVerb;
danászik:danász AddVerb;
dekázik:dekáz AddVerb;
dikciózik:dikcióz AddVerb;
divatozik:divatoz AddVerb;
dobózik:dobóz AddVerb;
dominózik:dominóz AddVerb;
duplázik:dupláz AddVerb;
dévánkozik:dévánkoz AddVerb;
ebugattázik:ebugattáz AddVerb;
egykézik:egykéz AddVerb;
előszobázik:előszobáz AddVerb;
epedezik:epedez AddVerb;
fagylaltozik:fagylaltoz AddVerb;
fasisztázik:fasisztáz AddVerb;
feketézik:feketéz AddVerb;
fiazik:fiaz AddVerb;
filmezik:filmez AddVerb;
fogadkozik:fogadkoz AddVerb;
fogyókúrázik:fogyókúráz AddVerb;
fonnyadozik:fonnyadoz AddVerb;
frakciózik:frakcióz AddVerb;
futballozik:futballoz AddVerb;
fáradozik:fáradoz AddVerb;
fürkészik:fürkész AddVerb;
gajdorászik:gajdorász AddVerb;
gecizik:geciz AddVerb;
gokartozik:gokartoz AddVerb;
gombozik:gomboz AddVerb;
gondolázik:gondoláz AddVerb;
gubózódik:gubózód AddVerb;
gyeplabdázik:gyeplabdáz AddVerb;
gyökerezik:gyökerez AddVerb;
gördeszkázik:gördeszkáz AddVerb;
gürizik:güriz AddVerb;
hagyakozik:hagyakoz AddVerb;
hajkurászik:hajkurász AddVerb;
hajózik:hajóz AddVerb;
hallózik:hallóz AddVerb;
hamuzik:hamuz AddVerb;
harangozik:harangoz AddVerb;
harmóniumozik:harmóniumoz AddVerb;
hazakívánkozik:hazakívánkoz AddVerb;
hazugozik:hazugoz AddVerb;
hervadozik:hervadoz AddVerb;
himbálózik:himbálóz AddVerb;
hivatkozik:hivatkoz AddVerb;
horgászik:horgász AddVerb;
hullámozik:hullámoz AddVerb;
háborúzik:háborúz AddVerb;
hógolyózik:hógolyóz AddVerb;
hüledezik:hüledez AddVerb;
illatozik:illatoz AddVerb;
ingadozik:ingadoz AddVerb;
internetezik:internetez AddVerb;
iskolázik:iskoláz AddVerb;
javítóvizsgázik:javítóvizsgáz AddVerb;
jojózik:jojóz AddVerb;
jégkrémezik:jégkrémez AddVerb;
kacsázik:kacsáz AddVerb;
kallózik:kallóz AddVerb;
kanasztázik:kanasztáz AddVerb;
karikázik:karikáz AddVerb;
keletkezik:keletkez AddVerb;
kerekezik:kerekez AddVerb;
kitárulkozik:kitárulkoz AddVerb;
kocsikázik:kocsikáz AddVerb;
komázik:komáz AddVerb;
kontrázik:kontráz AddVerb;
kornyadozik:kornyadoz AddVerb;
kosarazik:kosaraz AddVerb;
kozmetikázik:kozmetikáz AddVerb;
kukoricázik:kukoricáz AddVerb;
kvaterkázik:kvaterkáz AddVerb;
kárhozik:kárhoz AddVerb;
kéktúrázik:kéktúráz AddVerb;
kézimunkázik:kézimunkáz AddVerb;
kívánkozik:kívánkoz AddVerb;
kölykezik:kölykez AddVerb;
kúrázik:kúráz AddVerb;
különórázik:különóráz AddVerb;
lakmározik:lakmároz AddVerb;
lasszózik:lasszóz AddVerb;
legidázik:legidáz AddVerb;
lemalacozik:lemalacoz AddVerb;
lepkészik:lepkész AddVerb;
lopózik:lopóz AddVerb;
lármázik:lármáz AddVerb;
létezik:létez AddVerb;
magnózik:magnóz AddVerb;
makrózik:makróz AddVerb;
maradozik:maradoz AddVerb;
megbirkózik:megbirkóz AddVerb;
meredezik:meredez AddVerb;
misézik:miséz AddVerb;
motorozik:motoroz AddVerb;
málnázik:málnáz AddVerb;
mélázik:méláz AddVerb;
múlik:múl AddVerbasz;
nagydolgozik:nagydolgoz AddVerb;
nosztalgiázik:nosztalgiáz AddVerb;
nyilatkozik:nyilatkoz AddVerb;
nyújtózik:nyújtóz AddVerb;
ojtórik:ojtód AddVerb;
ordítozik:ordítoz AddVerb;
oázik:oáz AddVerb;
panamázik:panamáz AddVerb;
parázik:paráz AddVerb;
pedálozik:pedáloz AddVerb;
permetezik:permetez AddVerb;
piacozik:piacoz AddVerb;
pillangózik:pillangóz AddVerb;
piruettezik:piruettez AddVerb;
pityókázik:pityókáz AddVerb;
pofázik:pofáz AddVerb;
pompázik:pompáz AddVerb;
potyázik:potyáz AddVerb;
puhatolózik:puhatolóz AddVerb;
puzzle-ozik:puzzle-oz AddVerb;
párzódik:párzód AddVerb;
pókerezik:pókerez AddVerb;
randalírozik:randalíroz AddVerb;
rejtezik:rejtez AddVerb;
repetázik:repetáz AddVerb;
rikoltozik:rikoltoz AddVerb;
rizikózik:rizikóz AddVerb;
rollerezik:rollerez AddVerb;
rugdalózik:rugdalóz AddVerb;
rulettozik:rulettoz AddVerb;
rákászik:rákász AddVerb;
römizik:römiz AddVerb;
sikoltozik:sikoltoz AddVerb;
sms-ezik:sms-ez AddVerb;
subázik:subáz AddVerb;
szaladozik:szaladoz AddVerb;
szedtevettézik:szedtevettéz AddVerb;
szikrázik:szikráz AddVerb;
szobrozik:szobroz AddVerb;
szállingózik:szállingóz AddVerb;
szárítkozik:szárítkoz AddVerb;
szórakozik:szórakoz AddVerb;
súlyzózik:súlyzóz AddVerb;
tallózik:tallóz AddVerb;
tarisznyázik:tarisznyáz AddVerb;
telik:tel AddVerb;
tintázik:tintáz AddVerb;
toszik:tosz AddVerb;
tudakolózik:tudakolóz AddVerb;
tárogatózik:tárogatóz AddVerb;
tévézik:tévéz AddVerb;
túrázik:túráz AddVerb;
uzsonnázik:uzsonnáz AddVerb;
valutázik:valutáz AddVerb;
vickándozik:vickándoz AddVerb;
virágozik:virágoz AddVerb;
vonalazik:vonalaz AddVerb;
váltakozik:váltakoz AddVerb;
vész:vesz AddVerb;
zongorázik:zongoráz AddVerb;
zuhanyozik:zuhanyoz AddVerb;
ágazik:ágaz AddVerb;
áradozik:áradoz AddVerb;
éledezik:éledez AddVerb;
ígérkezik:ígérkez AddVerb;
ölelkezik:ölelkez AddVerb;
